Arkansas, session 2025, HB1236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 17, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-17-311. Public school employee contract — Release.
(a) An individual employed by a public school district or an open-
enrollment public charter school may unilaterally rescind his or her signed
contract for the subsequent school year if:
(1) He or she submits a signed, written document to the public
school district superintendent or his or her designee or the director of the
open-enrollment public charter school or his or her designee that provides
notification that he or she is rescinding his or her signed contract for the
subsequent school year; and
(2)(A) The signed, written request under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section is submitted before the end of the business day on May 15.
(B) If May 15 falls on a weekend, then the signed, written
*TNL057*
02-03-2025 09:41:16 TNL057

As Engrossed: H2/3/25 HB1236
request under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be submitted before
the end of the business day on the Friday before May 15.
(b) The rights conferred under this section do not conflict with
requirements and restrictions under § 6-17-2403.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that public school districts and
open-enrollment public charter schools will begin drafting employee contracts
as early as March 2025 for 2025-2026 school year; and that this act is
immediately necessary to ensure public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools correctly draft and issue employee contracts in time
for the 2025-2026 school year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Joey Carr














02-03-2025 09:41:16 TNL057